Utah statutes.
11-2-4.   Number of members of board -- Selection -- Term.

(1)  A recreation board shall consist of between five and seven persons.

(2) (a)  When established in a city of the first or second class two members shall be selected from the board of education of the school district therein, and when established in any county two members shall be appointed from the board of education of that county; provided, that in counties having two or more school districts one member shall be appointed from each county school district therein.

(b)  In any county having a regional service area and a recreation board consisting of more than five members, one of the members shall be appointed from the regional service area.

(3) (a)  The members of the board shall be appointed by the appointing authority of the  county, municipality, school district, or regional service area and shall serve for a term of five years and until their successors are appointed; and

(b)  provided, that the members first appointed shall be appointed for such terms that the term of one member will expire annually thereafter except that the terms of two members may expire during the same year when more than five members are appointed.

(4)  Vacancies in a board occurring otherwise than by expiration of term shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments for the unexpired term. The members of recreation boards shall serve without compensation.



Amended by Chapter 216, 1995 General Session

